Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 33. Prevention of Juvenile Delinquency and Other Problem Behaviors

§ 3301.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Council” means the Children and Family Council for Prevention Programs.

“Primary prevention” means efforts to reduce the likelihood of juvenile delinquency, truancy, substance abuse, child abuse, and other socially destructive behaviors before intervention by authorities.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 79

, § 1; amended

1985, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3302.
Children and Family Council for Prevention Programs.

A Children and Family Council for Prevention Programs is established. The Council shall consist of 21 members who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate for three-year terms. In the appointment of the members, consideration shall be given to the selection of persons who will adequately represent the interests of the beneficiaries of the primary prevention programs.

The Council shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and clerk from its members who shall serve for one year or until their successors are elected.

A majority of the members of the Council shall constitute a quorum. The Council shall act only by vote of a majority of its members present and voting at a meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.

In the event a vacancy occurs on the Council, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided in subsection (a) of this section. The term of a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall terminate on the date on which the original appointment would have terminated if the vacancy had not occurred.

Council members are authorized to receive per diem compensation from federal funds as specified in

32 V.S.A. § 1010(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 79

, § 1; amended

1985, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 61

, § 271a.

§ 3303.
Council; duties.

The Council shall assist State agencies and the departments in the development, improvement, and coordination of primary prevention programs and activities at the State and local levels. In providing this service, the Council shall:

acquire and provide pertinent research data and technical assistance related to the development and practice of primary prevention programs;

develop a State primary prevention plan that coordinates and consolidates the primary prevention planning efforts of the State agencies and departments specified in section 3305 of this title;

evaluate and prepare recommendations on the prevention policies and programs developed and implemented under section 3305 of this title and submit the recommendations on or before January 1 to the Governor, the House Committees on Human Services and on Appropriations, and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on Appropriations.

The Council shall administer the Children’s Trust Fund as provided in sections 3306 and 3307 of this title.

Subject to the provisions of

32 V.S.A. § 5

, the Council may apply for and receive federal or private funds, or any combination thereof in order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. To the extent that funding under the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, as amended, permits, the Council may award grants to State and local organizations for primary prevention activities in accordance with the provisions of that act.

The Council shall be attached for administrative purposes to the Agency of Human Services.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 79

§ 1; amended

1985, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 58, eff. May 20, 2014;

2021, No. 20

, § 317.

§ 3304.
State Primary Prevention Plan.

The State Primary Prevention Plan shall provide for the use of State resources in ways that will strengthen the commitment of local communities to altering conditions that contribute to delinquency or other problem behaviors so that the burden of State-funded treatment and crisis-oriented service programs will be reduced. The Plan shall set forth specific goals, objectives, and key result areas and shall include proposals to integrate and build upon successful methods of primary prevention.

By July 1 of each even-numbered year, the Council shall revise the State Primary Prevention Plan, which shall be submitted to the Governor, the House Committee on Human Services, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare, and the Senate Committee on Appropriations.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 79

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 293, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 3305.
Implementation and evaluation of Primary Prevention Plan.

Primary prevention policies and implementation practices shall be targeted to specific goals, objectives, and key result areas and shall be consistent with the State Primary Prevention Plan. The following departments and agencies shall formulate the policies and practices:

the Agency of Education;

the Agency of Human Services, including all departments;

the Department of Motor Vehicles;

the Office of the Attorney General;

the Agency of Commerce and Community Development;

the Department of Labor;

the Department of Public Safety; and

the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 79

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 60, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 3306.
Children’s Trust Fund.

A Children’s Trust Fund is established for the purpose of providing funds for community-based primary prevention programs that have been shown to be effective for juveniles. The Fund shall be maintained by the Agency of Human Services.

The Fund shall be composed of revenues from the following sources:

any private donations made by individuals or organizations to the Fund for the purposes of this chapter;

when authorized by the General Assembly, funds appropriated directly or combined with other funds appropriated for services or programs having purposes consistent with primary prevention;

funds received from the federal government as matching funds or other funds for the purposes set forth in this chapter;

funds held, donated to, or acquired by any State agency for purposes generally consistent with the purposes of this chapter and transferred at the direction of the Governor to the Children’s Trust Fund.

All interest accrued or generated by revenue in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be available for the payment of grants awarded from the Fund.

The administrator of the Children’s Trust Fund shall annually provide the Commissioner of Taxes the number of copies requested of an annual report of the items of income and expense of the Fund for the most recent fiscal year.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1995, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 318.

§ 3307.
Trust fund programs.

The Council shall plan, implement, and encourage primary prevention programs.

The Secretary of Human Services and the Council shall solicit proposals for grant awards from public and private persons and agencies. The Council shall evaluate the proposals and submit to the Secretary its priorities for awarding and funding grants.

Proposals shall be evaluated on the basis of the following criteria:

the demonstrated effectiveness of the program upon which the proposal is based;

the need for such services within the community;

other resources available to meet the need for primary prevention services;

the ability of the applicant to obtain funding from another source to cover a portion of the program costs.

To the extent that funds permit, the Secretary shall award grants to applicants of proposals that are recommended by the Council and shall administer such grants. The Council and Secretary shall monitor expenditures by grantees and evaluate the effectiveness of the programs, assistance, or services financed by the Children’s Trust Fund.

The Secretary of Human Services in conjunction with the Council shall develop guidelines for the coordination of programs and the application for and distribution of assistance from the Children’s Trust Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 3308.
Repealed. 2013, No. 142 (Adj. Sess.), § 100.

§ 3309.
Compliance with the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act.

The Department for Children and Families, within the Agency of Human Services, is the State agency designated for supervising the preparation and administration of the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act State Plan and is also designated as the State agency responsible for monitoring and data collection for purposes of compliance with the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 201

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 30, 2018.